Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 2 Legislative Proceedings
10-2-111. Unauthorized use of roll call system — Penalty.

Any person who, by tampering with the mechanism of the electric roll call system in the Chamber of the House of Representatives, shall willfully cause the vote indicated at any station to be incorrectly recorded shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction, he or she shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

Any person not a member of the House of Representatives who, during the taking of a vote on any matter before a session of the House or during the calling of a roll in the House, shall operate a voting station of the electric roll call system shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, he or she shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 310, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-114, 4-115.

10-2-112. Prefiling of bills and resolutions — Assignment to committee — Printing.

(1)The Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives and the Secretary of the Senate, under the direction and supervision of the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, shall establish a system for the prefiling of bills and resolutions beginning on:

November 15 of each year preceding a regular session of the General Assembly;

The second Monday of January of each year of a fiscal session of the General Assembly which is held in a year in which the preferential primary election is held in May under §7-7-203; and

The second Monday of March of each year of a fiscal session of the General Assembly which is held in a year in which the preferential primary election is held in March under §7-7-203.

A nonappropriation bill may not be prefiled prior to a fiscal session due to the requirement in Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 86, that a concurrent resolution be approved by a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the members elected to each house before either body may consider a nonappropriation bill.

Under that presession filing system, each member-elect of the General Assembly and holdover member of the Senate who will be serving at the next-following regular session of the General Assembly shall be permitted to prefile bills and resolutions for the next regular session as soon as the members-elect of the next General Assembly are certified to the Secretary of State.

The Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives and the Secretary of the Senate, respectively, shall assign numbers to House and Senate bills and resolutions.

The Speaker-elect of the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall provisionally assign all prefiled bills and resolutions to committees. Upon the convening of the General Assembly, the respective bodies shall review the assignment of the bills and resolutions made prior to the convening of the session by the Speaker-elect of the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and shall make official assignments of the bills and resolutions in accordance with their respective rules.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 91, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-146, 4-147; Acts 1987, No. 64, § 1; 1991, No. 203, § 1; 2003, No. 1473, § 18; 2009, No. 962, § 11; 2019, No. 545, § 6.

10-2-113. Senate confirmation of board and commission appointees.

All appointments made by the Governor of members of boards and commissions of the State of Arkansas, except appointments of members of boards and commissions governed by specific constitutional provisions that may be in conflict with this section, shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate. However, if any such appointment is made while the General Assembly is not in session, the person so appointed may qualify and hold office until the appointment shall be rejected by the Senate.

(1)The Governor shall submit to the Senate within thirty (30) days after the General Assembly convenes in a regular session and within fifteen (15) days after the General Assembly convenes in a fiscal session the names of all appointments to boards and commissions of this state made subsequent to adjournment of the Senate at the last regular session or fiscal session of the General Assembly.

Upon the convening of a special session of the General Assembly, the Governor shall immediately submit the names of all appointments to boards and commissions of this state made subsequent to adjournment of the Senate at the last regular session, fiscal session, or special session of the General Assembly.

All appointments of members of boards and commissions of this state made while the General Assembly is in session shall be submitted immediately to the Senate.

If an appointment is rejected by the Senate, the person rejected shall not thereafter be eligible to serve in the position or exercise the powers of the position, unless the appointment of the person is first approved by the Senate.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 235, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-606; Acts 2007, No. 151, § 1; 2009, No. 962, § 12.

10-2-114. Bills imposing new or additional costs on municipality or county — Fiscal impact statements — Definition.

(1)Any bill filed with the Senate that requires an expenditure of public funds by a municipality or county or otherwise imposes a new or increased cost obligation on any municipality or county shall have a fiscal impact statement attached to it prepared by the author of the bill and filed with the bill at the time of its introduction. A copy of such fiscal impact statement shall be placed on the desk of each member of the Senate committee to which the bill is referred before the bill may be called up for final action in the committee. A copy of it shall also be placed on the desk of each member of the Senate before a final vote may be taken on it for final passage.

If the author of any Senate or House of Representatives bill affected by this section shall fail to file a fiscal impact statement, any member of the Senate committee to which the bill is referred may object to its being called up for final action in the committee until a fiscal impact statement is made available to the committee. If such an objection is made by a member of the Senate committee, the chair of the committee shall refer the bill to the appropriate state agency or to the legislative staff for the preparation of a fiscal impact statement, to be returned to the committee in writing not later than five (5) days from the date of the request.

If any such Senate or House bill is called up for final passage in the Senate and a fiscal impact statement has not been provided by the author of the bill or by the committee to which the bill was referred, any member of the Senate may object to the bill's being called up for final passage until a fiscal impact statement is prepared and made available on the desk of each member of the Senate at least one (1) day prior to the bill’s being called up for final passage. If such an objection is made, the presiding officer of the Senate shall cause the bill to be referred to the appropriate state agency or to the designated legislative staff for the preparation of a fiscal impact statement which shall be filed in writing with the Senate not later than five (5) days from the date of the request.

(1)When any House or Senate bill requiring an expenditure of public funds or otherwise imposing a new or increased cost obligation on any municipality or county is pending before any committee of the House, any member of the committee may request that a fiscal impact statement for the bill be placed on the desk of each member of the committee before the bill is called up for final action in the committee. If a request is made, the chair of the committee shall refer the bill to the appropriate state agency or to the legislative staff for the preparation of a fiscal impact statement to be returned to the committee in writing not later than five (5) days from the date of the request.

Any time before the bill is read the third time in the House, a member of the House may request that a fiscal impact statement for the bill be prepared and placed on the desk of each member. When a member of the House so requests a fiscal impact statement on any bill, the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall furnish the member a fiscal impact statement signature form which shows the number of the bill for which the statement is requested and the date and time the request was made. If the member returns the form containing the signature of the requesting member and the signatures of at least nine (9) other House members within thirty (30) minutes of the time shown on the form, the fiscal impact statement shall be prepared and placed on the desk of each member of the House before the bill is read the third time.

If a bill is called up for final passage in the House and a fiscal impact statement has not been provided for the bill, any member of the House in which the bill is being considered may move that a final vote on the passage of the bill be delayed until a fiscal impact statement is prepared and made available on the desk of each member of the House at least one (1) full day prior to the bill's being called up for final passage. If the motion is made and is adopted by a majority vote of the membership of the House, the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall cause the bill to be referred to the appropriate state agency or to the designated legislative staff for the preparation of a fiscal impact statement which shall be filed with the House within five (5) days of the date of the request.

Failure of the sponsor of a bill to provide the fiscal impact statement required in this section shall not prohibit the consideration of it in the committee to which referred or on the floor of the house in which the bill is called up for final passage if no objection to it is made at the time such action is taken.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a committee to which a bill is referred or the house in which the bill is being considered from suspending the requirement of the filing of a fiscal impact statement on any such bill in the same manner as provided for the suspension of the rules in the house in which the bill is being considered.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 806, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2304; Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 43, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 734.

10-2-115. Introduction of bills affecting public retirement programs.

Any proposed legislation affecting any publicly supported retirement system or pension plan to be considered by the General Assembly at a regular session shall be introduced in the General Assembly during the first fifteen (15) calendar days of a regular session.

(1)No such bill shall be introduced after the fifteenth day of a regular session unless its introduction is first approved by a three-fourths (¾) vote of the full membership of each house of the General Assembly.

Additionally, if the General Assembly recesses for longer than three (3) consecutive days during the first fifteen (15) days of a regular session, the fifteen-day introduction deadline shall be extended for a time period equal to the recess.

A bill affecting any publicly supported retirement system or systems shall not be introduced or considered at any special session or fiscal session of the General Assembly unless the introduction and consideration of the bill is first approved by a three-fourths (¾) vote of the full membership of each house of the General Assembly.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 289, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-151; Acts 1991, No. 868, § 1; 1993, No. 102, § 1; 1999, No. 1026, § 1; 2001, No. 147, § 1; 2009, No. 962, § 13.

10-2-116. Authentication of laws passed over veto.

When a bill that has passed both houses of the General Assembly shall be returned by the Governor without his or her signature and with his or her objections thereto, and, upon reconsideration, shall pass both houses by the constitutional majority, it shall be authenticated as having become a law by a certificate endorsed thereon or attached thereto, in the following form:

The certificate, having been signed by the President of the Senate and Speaker of the House of Representatives, shall be deemed a sufficient authentication thereof, and the bill shall again be presented to the Governor to be by him or her deposited with the laws in the office of the Secretary of State.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 89, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 4969; Pope's Dig., § 6199; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-310.

10-2-117. Authentication of bill becoming law without Governor's signature.

Every bill which shall have passed both houses of the General Assembly and shall not be returned by the Governor within five (5) days, having thereby become a law, shall be authenticated by the Governor causing the fact to be certified thereon by the Secretary of State in the following form:

“This bill having remained with the Governor five (5) days, Sunday excepted, and the General Assembly being in session, it has become a law this
day of
. Secretary of State”.

Click to view form.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 89, § 2; C. & M. Dig., § 4971; Pope's Dig., § 6201; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-311.

Cross References. Bill becoming law without signature of Governor, Ark. Const., Art. 6, § 15.

10-2-118. Vacancies during recess.

When any member elected to either house of the General Assembly shall resign in the recess thereof, he or she shall address and transmit his or her resignation in writing to the Governor.

Whenever the Governor shall receive any resignation or notice of vacancy or when he or she shall be satisfied of the death of any member of either house during the recess thereof, he or she shall without delay issue a writ of election to support the vacancy.

Cross References. Governor to issue writs of election to fill vacancies, Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 6.

Cross References. Governor to issue writs of election to fill vacancies, Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 6.

Cross References. Special elections, time and notice, §7-5-202.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Former §10-2-122, concerning designation of members to represent state at national conferences and their expenses, is deemed to be superseded by this section. The former section was derived from Acts 1985, No. 1, § 8; 1985, No. 2, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-155, 4-156.

Members of the preceding General Assembly and the newly elected members of the House and Senate shall be eligible to attend the biennial Institute of Legislative Procedure and shall be entitled upon filing claim therefor to per diem in the amount fixed by law for members of the General Assembly to receive for attendance at legislative sessions, for each day in attending the biennial Institute of Legislative Procedure plus mileage for traveling from their place of residence to the biennial Institute of Legislative Procedure and return.

Per diem and mileage for members of the General Assembly and newly elected members of the General Assembly for attending the biennial Institute of Legislative Procedure shall be paid by the respective houses from the moneys appropriated therefor.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Former §10-2-123, concerning the Institute of Legislative Procedure, is deemed to be superseded by this section. The former section was derived from: Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 143, § 7; 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 204, § 8. Similar provisions which were also codified as §10-2-123, and were previously superseded, were derived from Acts 1985, No. 2, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-153; Acts 1987, No. 1, § 8; 1987, No. 2, § 7.

Acts 2011, No. 3, § 9, provided: “LEGISLATIVE INSTITUTE. Members of the preceding General Assembly and the newly elected members of the House of Representatives and Senate shall be eligible to attend the biennial Institute of Legislative Procedure and shall be entitled, upon filing claim therefor, to per diem in the amount fixed by law for members of the General Assembly to receive for attendance at Legislative sessions, for each day in attending the biennial Institute of Legislative Procedure plus mileage for traveling from their place of residence to the biennial Institute of Legislative Procedure and return.”

Acts 2012, No. 1, § 9, provided: “LEGISLATIVE INSTITUTE. Members of the preceding General Assembly and the newly elected members of the House of Representatives and Senate shall be eligible to attend the biennial Institute of Legislative Procedure and shall be entitled, upon filing claim therefor, to per diem in the amount fixed by law for members of the General Assembly to receive for attendance at Legislative sessions, for each day in attending the biennial Institute of Legislative Procedure plus mileage for traveling from their place of residence to the biennial Institute of Legislative Procedure and return.”

Acts 2018, No. 1, § 9, provided: “LEGISLATIVE INSTITUTE. Members of the preceding General Assembly and the newly elected members of the House of Representatives and Senate shall be eligible to attend the biennial Institute of Legislative Procedure and shall be entitled, upon filing claim therefor, to per diem in the amount fixed by law for members of the General Assembly to receive for attendance at Legislative sessions, for each day in attending the biennial Institute of Legislative Procedure plus mileage for traveling from their place of residence to the biennial Institute of Legislative Procedure and return.”

Acts 2020, No. 1, § 9, provided: “LEGISLATIVE INSTITUTE. Members of the preceding General Assembly and the newly elected members of the House of Representatives and Senate shall be eligible to attend the biennial Institute of Legislative Procedure and shall be entitled, upon filing claim therefore, to per diem in the amount fixed by law for members of the General Assembly to receive for attendance at Legislative sessions, for each day in attending the biennial Institute of Legislative Procedure plus mileage for traveling from their place of residence to the biennial Institute of Legislative Procedure and return”.

Cross References. Legislative Council, §10-3-301 et seq.

Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, §10-3-401 et seq.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2001, No. 443, § 9, provided:

“SENATE EMPLOYEES. The Senate Efficiency Committee may, at its discretion and subject to the approval of the Arkansas Senate, employ, transfer or discharge Arkansas Senate employees if it is determined by the committee to be in the best interest of the Arkansas Senate. The actual salaries to be paid to employees of the Arkansas Senate shall be determined by the Senate Efficiency Committee within the funds, appropriations and maximum annual salaries as may be available.”

Acts 2012, No. 59, § 10, provided: “SALARIES. In order that exceptionally well-qualified personnel may be recruited and retained, the Senate may exceed the maximum salary levels by no more than twenty percent (20%) for no more than one-third (1/3) of the positions authorized in their operation appropriation act, and may exceed the maximum salary levels for the purpose of merit adjustments for all positions.”

Cross References. Appointment of officers and judging qualifications of members, Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 11.

At least one (1) day before the bill may be called up for final action in the committee during a special session of the General Assembly.

An affirmative vote of two-thirds (2/3) of a quorum present and voting shall override the objection.

If an objection is made without override, the presiding officer of the House or Senate shall cause the bill to be referred to the office for the preparation of a fiscal impact statement which shall be filed with the presiding officer not later than five (5) days from the date of the request.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1995, No. 1253, § 1, is also codified as §19-1-701. Acts 1995, No. 1253, § 3 is also codified as §19-1-703.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted present (b)(2) and redesignated the following subdivision accordingly.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rule” for “regulation” twice in (a)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Department of Education” in (a)(2).

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 70, §§ 1, 2; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4962, 4963; Pope's Dig., §§ 6192, 6193; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-110, 4-111.

10-2-119. Vacancies during session.

When any member shall resign during any session, he or she shall address his or her resignation to the presiding officer of the house of which he or she is a member, which resignation shall be entered upon the journal.

In all cases of vacancies happening or being declared during any session of the General Assembly, by death, expulsion, or otherwise, the presiding officer of the house in which the vacancy shall happen shall immediately notify the Governor, who shall immediately issue a writ of election to fill the vacancy.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 70, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 4962; Pope's Dig., § 6192; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-110.

10-2-120. Elections to fill vacancies.

(1)When any vacancy shall happen in the Senate for a district composed of more than one (1) county, the writ of election shall be directed to the sheriff of the county first named in the law establishing the district.

When the vacancy shall happen in a senatorial district which shall have been divided or altered after the general election next preceding the occurrence of the vacancy, the writ of election shall be directed to the sheriff of the county first named in the old district.

When any vacancy shall happen in either house for any county which shall have been divided after the general election next preceding the occurrence of the vacancy, the writ of election shall be directed to the sheriff of the old county.

The sheriff to whom any writ of election shall be delivered shall cause the election to supply the vacancy to be held within the limits composing the county or district at the time of the next preceding general election. He or she shall issue his or her proclamation or notice for holding the election accordingly and transmit a copy thereof, together with a copy of the writ, to the sheriff of each of the counties within which any part of the old county may lie, who shall cause copies of the notice to be put up. The election is to be held accordingly in those parts of their respective counties which composed a part of the old county or district for which the election was held at the last preceding general election. The returns shall be made and the certificate of election granted in the same manner as if no division had taken place.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 70, §§ 3, 4; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4964, 4965; Pope's Dig., §§ 6194, 6195; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 4-112, 4-113.

10-2-121. Designation of members to assist Boys State and Girls State — Compensation.

The Speaker of the House of Representatives is authorized to designate up to ten (10) members of the House of Representatives at any one (1) time and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate is authorized to designate up to five (5) senators at any one (1) time to assist in the annual Boys State and Girls State sponsored by the American Legion and other student government organizations.

Monetary allowances for per diem and reimbursements for mileage as authorized by §10-2-217 for members assisting such organizations shall be paid to members of the House from any unexpended balance of House funds and to members of the Senate from any unexpended balance of Senate funds appropriated to support the respective houses of the General Assembly.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 182, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-150.

10-2-122. Designation of members to represent state at national conferences — Expenses.

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate or the Chair of the Senate Efficiency Committee, or both, are hereby authorized to designate one (1) or more members of the Senate or staff, or both, to represent the Senate at regional or national conferences of legislators or other official meetings held during the interim between legislative sessions at which the State of Arkansas is requested to be represented by members of the General Assembly and may pay the actual and necessary travel, meals, and lodging, and other expenses therefor from the funds appropriated to the Senate.

The Speaker of the House of Representatives is authorized to designate, subsequent to the adjournment of the General Assembly, one (1) or more members of the House of Representatives to represent the House at regional or national conferences of legislators or other official meetings held during the interim between legislative sessions at which the State of Arkansas is requested to be represented by members of the General Assembly and may pay the actual and necessary travel, meals and lodging, and other expenses.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 1, § 7; 1987, No. 2, § 8; 1993, No. 1, § 6.

10-2-123. Institute of Legislative Procedure.

The General Assembly hereby determines that the conducting of an Institute of Legislative Procedure prior to the convening of regular sessions of the General Assembly on rules and legislative procedure and current fiscal conditions and other problems in state government is essential to the proper functioning of each regular session of the General Assembly.

The Senate, the House of Representatives, the Legislative Council, and the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee shall cooperate in jointly sponsoring a biennial Institute of Legislative Procedure to carry out the aforementioned purposes.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 30, § 6; 1991, No. 134, § 7; 1991, No. 969, §§ 2, 7, 8; 1991, No. 1240, §§ 2, 7, 8; 1995, No. 3, § 8; 1997, No. 3, § 8.

10-2-124. Bills introduced to change existing circuit court districts.

All bills introduced in either house of the General Assembly to change any of the existing circuit court districts through redistricting or by providing additional judgeships shall be referred to the Senate Judiciary Committee if the bill is from the Senate or the House Judiciary Committee if the bill is from the House of Representatives.

The Senate Judiciary Committee or House Judiciary Committee shall request a letter certifying whether or not the proposed change meets the criteria of the Arkansas Judicial Council which shall be certified by the Secretary-treasurer of the Arkansas Judicial Council.

No bill to change any of the existing circuit court districts through redistricting or providing additional judgeships shall be acted upon in either committee until a letter certifying that the proposed change meets the criteria has been attached to the bill. Upon suspension of the Joint Rules of the House of Representatives and the Senate, a bill may be withdrawn from the House Judiciary Committee or Senate Judiciary Committee and acted upon without the certification of the council attached thereto.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 864, § 4.

10-2-125. Employees and officers.

The House Management Committee with the approval of the Speaker of the House of Representatives may employ at its discretion employees of the House of Representatives and may transfer or discharge any employee if it is deemed in the best interest of the House of Representatives.

(1)The Senate Efficiency Committee at its discretion and subject to the approval of the Senate may employ, transfer, or discharge Senate employees if it is determined by the Senate Efficiency Committee to be in the best interest of the Senate.

The actual salaries to be paid to employees of the Senate shall be determined by the Senate Efficiency Committee within the funds, appropriations, and maximum annual salaries as may be available.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1, § 2; 1991, No. 2, § 4; 1991, No. 30, §§ 7, 8; 1993, No. 671, § 7; 1995, No. 143, § 7; 2005, No. 693, § 8.

10-2-126. Assistant to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.

The Assistant to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall be under the direction of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.

The amount of salary to be paid to the assistant shall be determined by the Senate Efficiency Committee.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1, § 2.

10-2-127. Fiscal impact statement — Definition.

(1)As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, “fiscal impact statement” means a realistic written statement of the purpose of a proposed law, or a rule promulgated under a law, and the estimated financial cost to the state or any local school district of implementing or complying with the proposed law or rule.

The fiscal impact statement shall be developed by the Office of Economic and Tax Policy with the assistance of the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education within the guidelines adopted by the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education, as applicable.

Any bill filed in the House of Representatives or Senate that will impose a new or increased cost obligation for education in grades kindergarten through twelve (K-12) on the State of Arkansas or any local school district shall have a fiscal impact statement attached to it prepared and filed with the chair of the committee to which the bill is referred:

At least three (3) days before the bill may be called up for final action in the committee during a regular session of the General Assembly;

At least three (3) days before the bill may be called up for final action in the committee during a fiscal session; and

(1)(A)If any such House or Senate bill is called up for final passage in the House or Senate and a fiscal impact statement has not been provided by the author of the bill or by the committee to which the bill was referred, any member of the House or Senate may object to the bill's being called up for final passage until a fiscal impact statement is prepared and made available on the desk of each member of the House or Senate at least one (1) day prior to the bill's being called up for final passage.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1253, §§ 1, 3; 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 14, § 1; 2009, No. 962, § 14; 2019, No. 315, § 735; 2019, No. 910, § 2208.

10-2-128. Observance of Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr. holiday.

In respect to Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., and in observance of his birthday, neither the House of Representatives nor the Senate shall convene in session nor shall any of their committees meet on the third Monday in January.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 306, § 1.

10-2-129. Drafting and information requests to legislative employees — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Legislative employee” means an employee of the House of Representatives, the Senate, the Bureau of Legislative Research, Arkansas Legislative Audit, and the Arkansas Code Revision Commission; and

“Legislator” means any member of the General Assembly or a member-elect of the General Assembly.

A drafting request or information request made to a legislative employee by or on behalf of a legislator is confidential.

The identity of the legislator making the request, except to the extent necessary to fulfill the request, and the existence of the request shall not be revealed to any person who is not a legislative employee without the consent of the legislator.

Any supporting documents submitted or caused to be submitted to a legislative employee by a legislator in connection with a drafting or information request are confidential.

Except to the extent necessary to fulfill the request, the document, copies of the document, or the identity of the person, firm, or association producing it shall not be provided to any person who is not a legislative employee without the consent of the legislator.

Unless made public by the legislator, a drafting request, information request, supporting documents, and the drafts or the work product for a drafting request or information request are not public records under § 25-19-103.

The Legislative Council may authorize the staff of the bureau to provide assistance to state agencies and constitutional officers in preparing legislation.

If the Legislative Council authorizes the staff of the bureau to provide assistance to state agencies and constitutional officers in preparing legislation, the request, supporting documents, working papers, and drafts in the possession of the bureau are confidential and are not public records under § 25-19-103.

Nothing in this section prohibits a legislative employee from working on similar or identical drafting requests or information requests from more than one (1) legislator.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2005, No. 1260, § 1 provides in part that, effective July 1, 2005, employees of the Arkansas Code Revision Commission are transferred to the Bureau of Legislative Research and shall be employees of the bureau.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “Arkansas Legislative Audit” for “the Division of Legislative Audit” in (a)(1).

Studies conducted under § 10-3-2101 et seq. and Acts 2003, No. 1181 [expired]; and

Any study concerning the adequacy or equitability of the state's education system, including, but not limited to, the state's method of funding public school districts.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2007, No. 875, § 2, provided:

“This act shall apply beginning with the 2009 Regular Session of the General Assembly.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment added the subsection designations; and inserted “sessions, fiscal sessions”following “regular” in (a).

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1559, § 1; 2015, No. 554, § 2.

10-2-130. Use of education studies commissioned by General Assembly.

(1)Any cost study analysis, cost study audit, adequacy study, or other study commissioned or funded by the General Assembly concerning the state's education system and any conclusion or recommendation resulting from a cost study analysis, cost study audit, adequacy study, or other study concerning the state's education system is not binding upon the General Assembly.

The General Assembly may reject at any time any analysis, audit, or study and any conclusion or recommendation resulting from an analysis, audit, or study concerning the state's education system.

A cost study analysis, cost study audit, adequacy study, or other study concerning the state's education system shall include, but is not limited to:

History.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 37, § 1.

10-2-131. Internet broadcast of proceedings.

During regular sessions, fiscal sessions, and special sessions of the General Assembly, the House of Representatives and the Senate may broadcast live audio and video of their proceedings on the Internet.

This requirement includes only proceedings held in the House Chamber and the Senate Chamber.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 875, § 1; 2009, No. 962, § 15.

10-2-132. People First advisory legislative sessions concerning disability issues.

Each biennium, the House of Representatives and the Senate shall establish a People First advisory legislative session concerning disability issues and authorize staff assistance to conduct the People First advisory legislative session.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 769, § 1.